Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2349HH (1) 91 nls/ko H.F. 475 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 525.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âFinancial institutionâ means and includes any bank 4 incorporated under the provisions of any state or federal 5 law, any savings and loan association incorporated under the 6 provisions of federal law, any credit union organized under 7 the provisions of any state or federal law, any corporation 8 licensed as an industrial loan company under chapter 536A, and 9 any affiliate of a bank, savings and loan association, credit 10 union, or industrial loan company. 11 2. âNegotiable instrumentâ means the same as defined in 12 section 554.3104. 13 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 525.2 Financial institutions ââ 14 negotiable instruments. 15 1. A financial institution in the state shall do all of the 16 following: 17 a. Accept tender of any negotiable instrument in exchange 18 for issuance of a conditional credit to the tendering party. 19 b. Make a good-faith effort to obtain payment from the 20 original issuer of the negotiable instrument. 21 c. Remit cash to the original issuer from the payment of the 22 negotiable instrument within two days following the receipt of 23 the payment. 24 2. A financial institution receiving the tender of a 25 negotiable instrument may impose a fee for related services. 26 The fee for the services shall not exceed the greater of twenty 27 dollars, or one percent of the lesser of any of the following: 28 a. The face amount of the tendered negotiable instrument. 29 b. The amount of proceeds received by the financial 30 institution. 31 3. The financial institution shall not require the party 32 tendering a negotiable instrument to open an account with the 33 financial institution. 34 4. The financial institution shall not require the party 35 -1- LSB 2349HH (1) 91 nls/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 475 tendering a negotiable instrument to present identification. 1 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 525.3 Remedies. 2 1. A person who suffers a violation of this chapter may 3 bring an action to recover damages in an amount up to five 4 times the amount of the negotiable instrument and attorney 5 fees. 6 2. If a financial institution has denied acceptance of 7 a negotiable instrument three or more times, the financial 8 institution shall be assessed a civil penalty in the amount of 9 not less than ten thousand dollars, not to exceed twenty-five 10 thousand dollars, as determined by the court. 11